Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 ECONOMIC ASSISTANCE Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 35. new text end new text begin Electronic benefits transfer; contracting and procurement. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding chapter 16C, the commissioner is exempt from the contract term limits for the issuance of public benefits through an electronic benefit transfer system and related services. These contracts may have up to an initial five-year term, with extensions not to exceed a ten-year total contract duration. new text end ARTICLE 2 CHILD CARE PROVIDER PROGRAMS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142D.21, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Data. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the meanings given in this paragraph. new text end new text begin (1) "Great start compensation program support payment data" means data for a specified time period showing that a great start compensation payment under this section was made and the amount of great start compensation payments made to a child care and early learning program. new text end new text begin (2) "Data on children and families" means data about the enrollment and attendance as described in subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (2). new text end new text begin (b) Great start compensation program support payment data are public except that: new text end new text begin (1) any data on children and families collected by the great start compensation support payment program that may identify a specific family or child or, as determined by the commissioner, are private data on individuals as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12; new text end new text begin (2) great start compensation payment data about operating expenses and personnel expenses are private or nonpublic data; and new text end new text begin (3) great start compensation payment data about legal nonlicensed child care providers as described in subdivision 8 are private or nonpublic data. new text end ARTICLE 3 CHILD WELFARE Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260.65, is amended to read: 260.65 NONCUSTODIAL PARENTS; RELATIVE PLACEMENT. (a) Prior to the removal of an African American or a disproportionately represented child from the child's home, the responsible social services agency must make active efforts to identify and locate the child's noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent and the child's relatives to notify the child's parent and relatives that the child is or will be placed in foster caredeleted text begin ,deleted text end and provide the child's parent and relatives with a list of legal resources. The notice to the child's noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent and relatives must also include the information required under section 260C.221, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). The responsible social services agency must maintain detailed records of the agency's efforts to notify parents and relatives under this section. (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 260C.219, the responsible social services agency must assess an African American or a disproportionately represented child's noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent's ability to care for the child before placing the child in foster care. If a child's noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent is willing and able to provide daily care for the African American or disproportionately represented child temporarily or permanently, the court shall order deleted text begin thatdeleted text end the child deleted text begin be placed indeleted text end new text begin intonew text end the home of the noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent pursuant to section 260C.178 or 260C.201, subdivision 1. The responsible social services agency must make active efforts to assist a noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent with remedying any issues that may prevent the child from being deleted text begin placed with thedeleted text end new text begin ordered into the home of anew text end noncustodial or nonadjudicated parent. (c) The relative search, notice, engagement, and placement consideration requirements under section 260C.221 apply under this act. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260.66, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Emergency removal or placement permitted. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the emergency removal of an African American or a disproportionately represented deleted text begin child's parent or custodiandeleted text end new text begin childnew text end or the emergency placement of the child in a foster setting in order to prevent imminent physical damage or harm to the child. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260.691, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. new text begin Establishment and new text end duties. new text begin (a) The African American Child and Family Well-Being Advisory Council is established for the Department of Children, Youth, and Families. new text end new text begin (b) The council shall consist of 31 members appointed by the commissioner and must include representatives with lived personal or professional experience within African American communities. Members may include but are not limited to youth who have exited the child welfare system; parents; legal custodians; relative and kinship caregivers or foster care providers; community service providers, advocates, and members; county and private social services agency case managers; representatives from faith-based institutions; academic professionals; a representative from the Council for Minnesotans of African Heritage; the Ombudsperson for African American Families; and other individuals with experience and knowledge of African American communities. Council members must be selected through an open appointments process under section 15.0597. The terms, compensation, and removal of council members are governed by section 15.059. new text end new text begin (c) new text end The deleted text begin African American Child Well-Being Advisorydeleted text end council must: (1) review annual reports related to African American children involved in the child welfare system. These reports may include but are not limited to the maltreatment, out-of-home placement, and permanency of African American children; (2) assist with and make recommendations to the commissioner for developing strategies to reduce maltreatment determinations, prevent unnecessary out-of-home placement, promote culturally appropriate foster care and shelter or facility placement decisions and settings for African American children in need of out-of-home placement, ensure timely achievement of permanency, and improve child welfare outcomes for African American children and their families; (3) review summary reports on targeted case reviews prepared by the commissioner to ensure that responsible social services agencies meet the needs of African American children and their families. Based on data collected from those reviews, the council shall assist the commissioner with developing strategies needed to improve any identified child welfare outcomes, including but not limited to maltreatment, out-of-home placement, and permanency for African American children; (4) deleted text begin assist the Cultural and Ethnic Communities Leadership Council with makingdeleted text end new text begin makenew text end recommendations to the commissioner and the legislature for public policy and statutory changes that specifically consider the needs of African American children and their families involved in the child welfare system; (5) advise the commissioner on stakeholder engagement strategies and actions that the commissioner and responsible social services agencies may take to improve child welfare outcomes for African American children and their families; (6) assist the commissioner with developing strategies for public messaging and communication related to racial disproportionality and disparities in child welfare outcomes for African American children and their families; (7) assist the commissioner with identifying and developing internal and external partnerships to support adequate access to services and resources for African American children and their families, including but not limited to housing assistance, employment assistance, food and nutrition support, health care, child care assistance, and educational support and training; and (8) assist the commissioner with developing strategies to promote the development of a culturally diverse and representative child welfare workforce in Minnesota that includes professionals who are reflective of the community served and who have been directly impacted by lived experiences within the child welfare system. The council must also assist the commissioner with exploring strategies and partnerships to address education and training needs, hiring, recruitment, retention, and professional advancement practices. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260.692, is amended to read: 260.692 AFRICAN AMERICAN CHILD new text begin AND FAMILY new text end WELL-BEING UNIT. Subdivision 1. Duties. The African American Child new text begin and Family new text end Well-Being Unit, currently established by the commissioner, must: (1) assist with the development of African American cultural competency training and review child welfare curriculum in the Minnesota Child Welfare Training Academy to ensure that responsible social services agency staff and other child welfare professionals are appropriately prepared to engage with African American children and their families and to support family preservation and reunification; (2) provide technical assistance, including on-site technical assistance, and case consultation to responsible social services agencies to assist agencies with implementing and complying with the Minnesota African American Family Preservation and Child Welfare Disproportionality Act; (3) monitor individual county and statewide disaggregated and nondisaggregated data to identify trends and patterns in child welfare outcomes, including but not limited to reporting, maltreatment, out-of-home placement, and permanency of African American children and develop strategies to address disproportionality and disparities in the child welfare system; (4) develop and implement a system for conducting case reviews when the commissioner receives reports of noncompliance with the Minnesota African American Family Preservation and Child Welfare Disproportionality Act or when requested by the parent or custodian of an African American child. Case reviews may include but are not limited to a review of placement prevention efforts, safety planning, case planning and service provision by the responsible social services agency, relative placement consideration, and permanency planning; (5) establish and administer a request for proposals process for African American and disproportionately represented family preservation grants under section 260.693, monitor grant activities, and provide technical assistance to grantees; (6) in coordination with the African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Advisory Council, coordinate services and create internal and external partnerships to support adequate access to services and resources for African American children and their families, including but not limited to housing assistance, employment assistance, food and nutrition support, health care, child care assistance, and educational support and training; and (7) develop public messaging and communication to inform the public about racial disparities in child welfare outcomes, current efforts and strategies to reduce racial disparities, and resources available to African American children and their families involved in the child welfare system. Subd. 2. Case reviews. (a) The African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Unit must conduct systemic case reviews to monitor targeted child welfare outcomes, including but not limited to maltreatment, out-of-home placement, and permanency of African American children. (b) The reviews under this subdivision must be conducted using a random sampling of representative child welfare cases stratified for certain case related factors, including but not limited to case type, maltreatment type, if the case involves out-of-home placement, and other demographic variables. In conducting the reviews, unit staff may use court records and documents, information from the social services information system, and other available case file information to complete the case reviews. (c) The frequency of the reviews and the number of cases, child welfare outcomes, and selected counties reviewed shall be determined by the unit in consultation with the African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Advisory Council, with consideration given to the availability of unit resources needed to conduct the reviews. (d) The unit must monitor all case reviews and use the collective case review information and data to generate summary case review reports, ensure compliance with the Minnesota African American Family Preservation and Child Welfare Disproportionality Act, and identify trends or patterns in child welfare outcomes for African American children. (e) The unit must review information from members of the public received through the compliance and feedback portal, including policy and practice concerns related to individual child welfare cases. After assessing a case concern, the unit may determine if further necessary action should be taken, which may include coordinating case remediation with other relevant child welfare agencies in accordance with data privacy laws, including the African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Advisory Council, and offering case consultation and technical assistance to the responsible local social services agency as needed or requested by the agency. Subd. 3. Reports. (a) The African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Unit must provide regular updates on unit activities, including summary reports of case reviews, to the African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Advisory Council, and must publish an annual census of African American children in out-of-home placements statewide. The annual census must include data on the types of placements, age and sex of the children, how long the children have been in out-of-home placements, and other relevant demographic information. (b) The African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Unit shall gather summary data about the practice and policy inquiries and individual case concerns received through the compliance and feedback portal under subdivision 2, paragraph (e). The unit shall provide regular reports of the nonidentifying compliance and feedback portal summary data to the African American Childnew text begin and Familynew text end Well-Being Advisory Council to identify child welfare trends and patterns to assist with developing policy and practice recommendations to support eliminating disparity and disproportionality for African American children. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.001, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Juvenile protection proceedings. (a) The paramount consideration in all juvenile protection proceedings is the health, safety, and best interests of the child. In proceedings involving an American Indian child, as defined in section 260.755, subdivision 8, the best interests of the child must be determined consistent with sections 260.751 to 260.835 and the Indian Child Welfare Act, United States Code, title 25, sections 1901 to 1923. (b) The purpose of the laws relating to juvenile protection proceedings is: (1) to secure for each child under the jurisdiction of the court, the care and guidance, preferably in the child's own home, as will best serve the spiritual, emotional, mental, and physical welfare of the child; (2) to provide judicial procedures that protect the welfare of the child; (3) to preserve and strengthen the child's family ties whenever possible and in the child's best interests, removing the child from the custody of parents only when the child's welfare or safety cannot be adequately safeguarded without removal; (4) to ensure that when removal from the child's own family is necessary and in the child's best interests, the responsible social services agency has legal responsibility for the child removal either: (i) pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement between the child's parent or guardian or the child, when the child is over age 18, and the responsible social services agency; or (ii) by court order pursuant to section 260C.151, subdivision 6; 260C.178; 260C.201; 260C.325; or 260C.515; (5) to ensure that, when placement is pursuant to court order, the court order removing the child or continuing the child in foster care contains an individualized determination that placement is in the best interests of the child that coincides with the actual removal of the child; (6) to ensure that when the child is removed, the child's care and discipline is, as nearly as possible, equivalent to that which should have been given by the parents and is either in: (i) the home of a noncustodial parent pursuant to section 260C.178 or 260C.201, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (1); (ii) the home of a relative pursuant to emergency placement by the responsible social services agency under chapter 245A; or (iii) foster care licensed under chapter 245A; and (7) to ensure appropriate permanency planning for children in foster care including: (i) unless reunification is not required under section 260.012, developing a permanency plan for the child that includes a primary plan for reunification with the child's parent or guardian and a secondary plan for an alternative, legally permanent home for the child in the event reunification cannot be achieved in a timely manner; (ii) identifying, locating, and assessing both parents of the child as soon as possible and offering reunification services to both parents of the child as required under sections 260.012 and 260C.219; new text begin (iii) inquiring about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761, and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10; new text end deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (iv)new text end identifying, locating, and notifying relatives of both parents of the child according to section 260C.221; deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (v)new text end making a placement with a family that will commit to being the legally permanent home for the child in the event reunification cannot occur at the earliest possible time while at the same time actively supporting the reunification plan; and deleted text begin (v)deleted text end new text begin (vi)new text end returning the child home with supports and services, as soon as return is safe for the child, or when safe return cannot be timely achieved, moving to finalize another legally permanent home for the child. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.007, subdivision 19, is amended to read: Subd. 19. Habitual truant. "Habitual truant" means a child deleted text begin under the age of 17deleted text end new text begin who is at least 12 years old and less than 18new text end years new text begin old new text end who is absent from attendance at school without lawful excuse deleted text begin for seven school days per school year if the child is in elementary school ordeleted text end for one or more class periods on seven school days per school year if the child is in middle school, junior high school, or high school or a child who is 17 years of age who is absent from attendance at school without lawful excuse for one or more class periods on seven school days per school year and who has not lawfully withdrawn from school under section 120A.22, subdivision 8.new text begin Pursuant to section 260C.163, subdivision 11, habitual truant also means a child under age 12 who has been absent from school for seven school days without lawful excuse, based on a showing by clear and convincing evidence that the child's absence is not due to the failure of the child's parent, guardian, or custodian to comply with compulsory instruction laws.new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.141, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Who may file; required form. (a) Any reputable person, including but not limited to any agent of the commissioner of children, youth, and families, having knowledge of a child in this state or of a child who is a resident of this state, who appears to be in need of protection or services or neglected and in foster care, may petition the juvenile court in the manner provided in this section. (b) A petition for a child in need of protection filed by an individual who is not a county attorney or an agent of the commissioner of children, youth, and families shall be filed on a form developed by the state court administrator and provided to court administrators. Copies of the form may be obtained from the court administrator in each county. The court administrator shall review the petition before it is filed to determine that it is completed. The court administrator may reject the petition if it does not indicate that the petitioner has contacted the responsible social services agency. An individual may file a petition under this subdivision without seeking internal review of the responsible social services agency's decision. The court shall determine whether there is probable cause to believe that a need for protection or services exists before the matter is set for hearing. If the matter is set for hearing, the court administrator shall notify the responsible social services agency by sending notice to the county attorney. The petition must contain: (1) a statement of facts that would establish, if proven, that there is a need for protection or services for the child named in the petition; (2) a statement that petitioner has reported the circumstances underlying the petition to the responsible social services agency, and protection or services were not provided to the child; (3) a statement whether there are existing juvenile or family court custody orders or pending proceedings in juvenile or family court concerning the child; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) a statement of the relationship of the petitioner to the child and any other partiesdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) a statement whether the petitioner has inquired of the parent or parents of the child, the child, and relatives about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10. new text end The court may not allow a petition to proceed under this paragraph if it appears that the sole purpose of the petition is to modify custody between the parents. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.150, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Identifying parents of child; diligent efforts; data. (a) The responsible social services agency shall make diligent effortsnew text begin to inquire about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10, andnew text end to identify and locate both parents of any child who is the subject of proceedings under this chapter. Diligent efforts include: (1) asking the custodial or known parent to identify any nonresident parent of the child and provide information that can be used to verify the nonresident parent's identity including the dates and locations of marriages and divorces; dates and locations of any legal proceedings regarding paternity; date and place of the child's birth; nonresident parent's full legal name; nonresident parent's date of birth, or if the nonresident parent's date of birth is unknown, an approximate age; the nonresident parent's Social Security number; the nonresident parent's whereabouts including last known whereabouts; and the whereabouts of relatives of the nonresident parent. For purposes of this subdivision, "nonresident parent" means a parent who does not reside in the same household as the child or did not reside in the same household as the child at the time the child was removed when the child is in foster care; (2) obtaining information that will identify and locate the nonresident parent from the county and state of Minnesota child support enforcement information system; (3) requesting a search of the Minnesota Fathers' Adoption Registry 30 days after the child's birth; and (4) using any other reasonable means to identify and locate the nonresident parent. (b) The agency may disclose data which is otherwise private under section 13.46 or chapter 260E in order to carry out its duties under this subdivision. (c) Upon the filing of a petition alleging the child to be in need of protection or services, the responsible social services agency may contact a putative father who registered with the Minnesota Fathers' Adoption Registry more than 30 days after the child's birth. The social service agency may consider a putative father for the day-to-day care of the child under section 260C.219 if the putative father cooperates with genetic testing and there is a positive test result under section 257.62, subdivision 5. Nothing in this paragraph: (1) relieves a putative father who registered with the Minnesota Fathers' Adoption Registry more than 30 days after the child's birth of the duty to cooperate with paternity establishment proceedings under section 260C.219; (2) gives a putative father who registered with the Minnesota Fathers' Adoption Registry more than 30 days after the child's birth the right to notice under section 260C.151 unless the putative father is entitled to notice under sections 259.24 and 259.49, subdivision 1, paragraph (a) or (b), clauses (1) to (7); or (3) establishes a right to assert an interest in the child in a termination of parental rights proceeding contrary to section 259.52, subdivision 6, unless the putative father is entitled to notice under sections 259.24 and 259.49, subdivision 1, paragraph (a) or (b), clauses (1) to (7). Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.178, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Hearing and release requirements. (a) If a child was taken into custody under section 260C.175, subdivision 1, clause (1) or (2), item (ii), the court shall hold a hearing within 72 hours of the time that the child was taken into custody, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, to determine whether the child should continue to be in custody. (b) Unless there is reason to believe that the child would endanger self or others or not return for a court hearing, or that the child's health or welfare would be immediately endangered, the child shall be released to the custody of a parent, guardian, custodian, or other suitable person, subject to reasonable conditions of release including, but not limited to, a requirement that the child undergo a chemical use assessment as provided in section 260C.157, subdivision 1. (c) If the court determines that there is reason to believe that the child would endanger self or others or not return for a court hearing, or that the child's health or welfare would be immediately endangered if returned to the care of the parent or guardian who has custody and from whom the child was removed, the court shall order the child: (1) into the care of the child's noncustodial parent and order the noncustodial parent to comply with any conditions that the court determines appropriate to ensure the safety and care of the child, including requiring the noncustodial parent to cooperate with paternity establishment proceedings if the noncustodial parent has not been adjudicated the child's father; or (2) into foster care as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 18, under the legal responsibility of the responsible social services agency or responsible probation or corrections agency for the purposes of protective care as that term is used in the juvenile court rules. The court shall not give the responsible social services legal custody and order a trial home visit at any time prior to adjudication and disposition under section 260C.201, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (3), but may order the child returned to the care of the parent or guardian who has custody and from whom the child was removed and order the parent or guardian to comply with any conditions the court determines to be appropriate to meet the safety, health, and welfare of the child. (d) In determining whether the child's health or welfare would be immediately endangered, the court shall consider whether the child would reside with a perpetrator of domestic child abuse. (e) The court, before determining whether a child should be placed in or continue in foster care under the protective care of the responsible agency, shall also make a determination, consistent with section 260.012 as to whether reasonable efforts were made to prevent placement or whether reasonable efforts to prevent placement are not required. In the case of an Indian child, the court shall determine whether active efforts, according to section 260.762 and the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, United States Code, title 25, section 1912(d), were made to prevent placement. The court shall enter a finding that the responsible social services agency has made reasonable efforts to prevent placement when the agency establishes either: (1) that the agency has actually provided services or made efforts in an attempt to prevent the child's removal but that such services or efforts have not proven sufficient to permit the child to safely remain in the home; or (2) that there are no services or other efforts that could be made at the time of the hearing that could safely permit the child to remain home or to return home. The court shall not make a reasonable efforts determination under this clause unless the court is satisfied that the agency has sufficiently demonstrated to the court that there were no services or other efforts that the agency was able to provide at the time of the hearing enabling the child to safely remain home or to safely return home. When reasonable efforts to prevent placement are required and there are services or other efforts that could be ordered that would permit the child to safely return home, the court shall order the child returned to the care of the parent or guardian and the services or efforts put in place to ensure the child's safety. When the court makes a prima facie determination that one of the circumstances under paragraph (g) exists, the court shall determine that reasonable efforts to prevent placement and to return the child to the care of the parent or guardian are not required. (f) If the court finds the social services agency's preventive or reunification efforts have not been reasonable but further preventive or reunification efforts could not permit the child to safely remain at home, the court may nevertheless authorize or continue the removal of the child. (g) The court may not order or continue the foster care placement of the child unless the court makes explicit, individualized findings that continued custody of the child by the parent or guardian would be contrary to the welfare of the child and that placement is in the best interest of the child. (h) At the emergency removal hearing, or at any time during the course of the proceeding, and upon notice and request of the county attorney, the court shall determine whether a petition has been filed stating a prima facie case that: (1) the parent has subjected a child to egregious harm as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 14; (2) the parental rights of the parent to another child have been involuntarily terminated; (3) the child is an abandoned infant under section 260C.301, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (2); (4) the parents' custodial rights to another child have been involuntarily transferred to a relative under a juvenile protection proceeding or a similar process of another jurisdiction; (5) the parent has committed sexual abuse as defined in section 260E.03, against the child or another child of the parent; (6) the parent has committed an offense that requires registration as a predatory offender under section 243.166, subdivision 1b, paragraph (a) or (b); or (7) the provision of services or further services for the purpose of reunification is futile and therefore unreasonable. (i) When a petition to terminate parental rights is required under section 260C.301, subdivision 4, or 260C.503, subdivision 2, but the county attorney has determined not to proceed with a termination of parental rights petition, and has instead filed a petition to transfer permanent legal and physical custody to a relative under section 260C.507, the court shall schedule a permanency hearing within 30 days of the filing of the petition. (j) If the county attorney has filed a petition under section 260C.307, the court shall schedule a trial under section 260C.163 within 90 days of the filing of the petition except when the county attorney determines that the criminal case shall proceed to trial first under section 260C.503, subdivision 2, paragraph (c). (k) If the court determines the child should be ordered into foster care deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin , the court shall inquire about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761; their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10; and the responsible social services agency's initial relative search efforts. Ifnew text end the child's parent refuses to give information to the responsible social services agency regarding the child's father or relatives of the child, the court may order the parent to disclose the names, addresses, telephone numbers, and other identifying information to the responsible social services agency for the purpose of complying with sections 260C.150, 260C.151, 260C.212, 260C.215, 260C.219, and 260C.221. (l) If a child ordered into foster care has siblings, whether full, half, or step, who are also ordered into foster care, the court shall inquire of the responsible social services agency of the efforts to place the children together as required by section 260C.212, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), if placement together is in each child's best interests, unless a child is in placement for treatment or a child is placed with a previously noncustodial parent who is not a parent to all siblings. If the children are not placed together at the time of the hearing, the court shall inquire at each subsequent hearing of the agency's reasonable efforts to place the siblings together, as required under section 260.012. If any sibling is not placed with another sibling or siblings, the agency must develop a plan to facilitate visitation or ongoing contact among the siblings as required under section 260C.212, subdivision 1, unless it is contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the siblings to do so. (m) When the court has ordered the child into the care of a noncustodial parent or in foster care, the court may order a chemical dependency evaluation, mental health evaluation, medical examination, and parenting assessment for the parent as necessary to support the development of a plan for reunification required under subdivision 7 and section 260C.212, subdivision 1, or the child protective services plan under section 260E.26, and Minnesota Rules, part 9560.0228. (n) When the court has ordered an Indian child into an emergency child placement, the Indian child shall be placed according to the placement preferences in the Minnesota Indian Family Preservation Act, section 260.773. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.178, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Case plan. (a) When the court has ordered the child into the care of a parent under subdivision 1, paragraph (c), clause (1), the child protective services plan under section 260E.26 must be filed within 30 days of the filing of the juvenile protection petition under section 260C.141, subdivision 1. (b) When the court orders the child into foster care under subdivision 1, paragraph (c), clause (2), and not into the care of a parent, an out-of-home placement plannew text begin summarynew text end required under section 260C.212new text begin , subdivision 1,new text end must be filed with the court within 30 days of the filing of a juvenile protection petition under section 260C.141, subdivision 1, when the court orders emergency removal of the child under this section, or filed with the petition if the petition is a review of a voluntary placement under section 260C.141, subdivision 2.new text begin An out-of-home placement plan shall be prepared and filed with the court within 60 days after any child is placed in foster care under section 260C.212, subdivision 1.new text end (c) Upon the filing of the child protective services plan under section 260E.26 or out-of-home placement plan that has been developed jointly with the parent and in consultation with others as required under section 260C.212, subdivision 1, the court may approve implementation of the plan by the responsible social services agency based on the allegations contained in the petition and any evaluations, examinations, or assessments conducted under subdivision 1, paragraph (m). The court shall send written notice of the approval of the child protective services plan or out-of-home placement plan to all parties and the county attorney or may state such approval on the record at a hearing. A parent may agree to comply with the terms of the plan filed with the court. (d) The responsible social services agency shall make reasonable efforts to engage both parents of the child in case planning. The responsible social services agency shall report the results of its efforts to engage the child's parents in the child protective services plan or out-of-home placement plan filed with the court. The agency shall notify the court of the services it will provide or efforts it will attempt under the plan notwithstanding the parent's refusal to cooperate or disagreement with the services. The parent may ask the court to modify the plan to require different or additional services requested by the parent, but which the agency refused to provide. The court may approve the plan as presented by the agency or may modify the plan to require services requested by the parent. The court's approval must be based on the content of the petition. (e) Unless the parent agrees to comply with the terms of the child protective services plan or out-of-home placement plan, the court may not order a parent to comply with the provisions of the plan until the court finds the child is in need of protection or services and orders disposition under section 260C.201, subdivision 1. However, the court may find that the responsible social services agency has made reasonable efforts for reunification if the agency makes efforts to implement the terms of the child protective services plan or out-of-home placement plan approved under this section. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.201, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Dispositions. (a) If the court finds that the child is in need of protection or services or neglected and in foster care, the court shall enter an order making any of the following dispositions of the case: (1) place the child under the protective supervision of the responsible social services agency or child-placing agency in the home of a parent of the child under conditions prescribed by the court directed to the correction of the child's need for protection or services: (i) the court may order the child into the home of a parent who does not otherwise have legal custody of the child, however, an order under this section does not confer legal custody on that parent; (ii) if the court orders the child into the home of a father who is not adjudicated, the father must cooperate with paternity establishment proceedings regarding the child in the appropriate jurisdiction as one of the conditions prescribed by the court for the child to continue in the father's home; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (iii) the court may order the child into the home of a noncustodial parent with conditions and may also order both the noncustodial and the custodial parent to comply with the requirements of a case plan under subdivision 2; or (2) transfer legal custody to one of the following: (i) a child-placing agency; or (ii) the responsible social services agency. In making a foster care placement of a child whose custody has been transferred under this subdivision, new text begin the court shall inquire about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10, and new text end the agency shall make an individualized determination of how the placement is in the child's best interests using the placement consideration order for relatives and the best interest factors in section 260C.212, subdivision 2, and may include a child colocated with a parent in a licensed residential family-based substance use disorder treatment program under section 260C.190; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) order a trial home visit without modifying the transfer of legal custody to the responsible social services agency under clause (2). Trial home visit means the child is returned to the care of the parent or guardian from whom the child was removed for a period not to exceed six months. During the period of the trial home visit, the responsible social services agency: (i) shall continue to have legal custody of the child, which means that the agency may see the child in the parent's home, at school, in a child care facility, or other setting as the agency deems necessary and appropriate; (ii) shall continue to have the ability to access information under section 260C.208; (iii) shall continue to provide appropriate services to both the parent and the child during the period of the trial home visit; (iv) without previous court order or authorization, may terminate the trial home visit in order to protect the child's health, safety, or welfare and may remove the child to foster care; (v) shall advise the court and parties within three days of the termination of the trial home visit when a visit is terminated by the responsible social services agency without a court order; and (vi) shall prepare a report for the court when the trial home visit is terminated whether by the agency or court order that describes the child's circumstances during the trial home visit and recommends appropriate orders, if any, for the court to enter to provide for the child's safety and stability. In the event a trial home visit is terminated by the agency by removing the child to foster care without prior court order or authorization, the court shall conduct a hearing within ten days of receiving notice of the termination of the trial home visit by the agency and shall order disposition under this subdivision or commence permanency proceedings under sections 260C.503 to 260C.515. The time period for the hearing may be extended by the court for good cause shown and if it is in the best interests of the child as long as the total time the child spends in foster care without a permanency hearing does not exceed 12 months; (4) if the child has been adjudicated as a child in need of protection or services because the child is in need of special services or care to treat or ameliorate a physical or mental disability or emotional disturbance as defined in section 245.4871, subdivision 15, the court may order the child's parent, guardian, or custodian to provide it. The court may order the child's health plan company to provide mental health services to the child. Section 62Q.535 applies to an order for mental health services directed to the child's health plan company. If the health plan, parent, guardian, or custodian fails or is unable to provide this treatment or care, the court may order it provided. Absent specific written findings by the court that the child's disability is the result of abuse or neglect by the child's parent or guardian, the court shall not transfer legal custody of the child for the purpose of obtaining special treatment or care solely because the parent is unable to provide the treatment or care. If the court's order for mental health treatment is based on a diagnosis made by a treatment professional, the court may order that the diagnosing professional not provide the treatment to the child if it finds that such an order is in the child's best interests; or (5) if the court believes that the child has sufficient maturity and judgment and that it is in the best interests of the child, the court may order a child 16 years old or older to be allowed to live independently, either alone or with others as approved by the court under supervision the court considers appropriate, if the county board, after consultation with the court, has specifically authorized this dispositional alternative for a child. (b) If the child was adjudicated in need of protection or services because the child is a runaway or habitual truant, the court may order any of the following dispositions in addition to or as alternatives to the dispositions authorized under paragraph (a): (1) counsel the child or the child's parents, guardian, or custodian; (2) place the child under the supervision of a probation officer or other suitable person in the child's own home under conditions prescribed by the court, including reasonable rules for the child's conduct and the conduct of the parents, guardian, or custodian, designed for the physical, mental, and moral well-being and behavior of the child; (3) subject to the court's supervision, transfer legal custody of the child to one of the following: (i) a reputable person of good moral character. No person may receive custody of two or more unrelated children unless licensed to operate a residential program under sections 245A.01 to 245A.16; or (ii) a county probation officer for placement in a group foster home established under the direction of the juvenile court and licensed pursuant to section 241.021; (4) require the child to pay a fine of up to $100. The court shall order payment of the fine in a manner that will not impose undue financial hardship upon the child; (5) require the child to participate in a community service project; (6) order the child to undergo a chemical dependency evaluation and, if warranted by the evaluation, order participation by the child in a drug awareness program or an inpatient or outpatient chemical dependency treatment program; (7) if the court believes that it is in the best interests of the child or of public safety that the child's driver's license or instruction permit be canceled, the court may order the commissioner of public safety to cancel the child's license or permit for any period up to the child's 18th birthday. If the child does not have a driver's license or permit, the court may order a denial of driving privileges for any period up to the child's 18th birthday. The court shall forward an order issued under this clause to the commissioner, who shall cancel the license or permit or deny driving privileges without a hearing for the period specified by the court. At any time before the expiration of the period of cancellation or denial, the court may, for good cause, order the commissioner of public safety to allow the child to apply for a license or permit, and the commissioner shall so authorize; (8) order that the child's parent or legal guardian deliver the child to school at the beginning of each school day for a period of time specified by the court; or (9) require the child to perform any other activities or participate in any other treatment programs deemed appropriate by the court. To the extent practicable, the court shall enter a disposition order the same day it makes a finding that a child is in need of protection or services or neglected and in foster care, but in no event more than 15 days after the finding unless the court finds that the best interests of the child will be served by granting a delay. If the child was under eight years of age at the time the petition was filed, the disposition order must be entered within ten days of the finding and the court may not grant a delay unless good cause is shown and the court finds the best interests of the child will be served by the delay. (c) If a child who is 14 years of age or older is adjudicated in need of protection or services because the child is a habitual truant and truancy procedures involving the child were previously dealt with by a school attendance review board or county attorney mediation program under section 260A.06 or 260A.07, the court shall order a cancellation or denial of driving privileges under paragraph (b), clause (7), for any period up to the child's 18th birthday. (d) In the case of a child adjudicated in need of protection or services because the child has committed domestic abuse and been ordered excluded from the child's parent's home, the court shall dismiss jurisdiction if the court, at any time, finds the parent is able or willing to provide an alternative safe living arrangement for the child as defined in paragraph (f). (e) When a parent has complied with a case plan ordered under subdivision 6 and the child is in the care of the parent, the court may order the responsible social services agency to monitor the parent's continued ability to maintain the child safely in the home under such terms and conditions as the court determines appropriate under the circumstances. (f) For the purposes of this subdivision, "alternative safe living arrangement" means a living arrangement for a child proposed by a petitioning parent or guardian if a court excludes the minor from the parent's or guardian's home that is separate from the victim of domestic abuse and safe for the child respondent. A living arrangement proposed by a petitioning parent or guardian is presumed to be an alternative safe living arrangement absent information to the contrary presented to the court. In evaluating any proposed living arrangement, the court shall consider whether the arrangement provides the child with necessary food, clothing, shelter, and education in a safe environment. Any proposed living arrangement that would place the child in the care of an adult who has been physically or sexually violent is presumed unsafe. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.201, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Written findings. (a) Any order for a disposition authorized under this section shall contain written findings of fact to support the disposition and case plan ordered and shall also set forth in writing the following information: (1) why the best interests and safety of the child are served by the disposition and case plan ordered; (2) what alternative dispositions or services under the case plan were considered by the court and why such dispositions or services were not appropriate in the instant case; (3) when legal custody of the child is transferred, the appropriateness of the particular placement made or to be made by the placing agency using the relative and sibling placement considerations and best interest factors in section 260C.212, subdivision 2, or the appropriateness of a child colocated with a parent in a licensed residential family-based substance use disorder treatment program under section 260C.190; (4) whether reasonable efforts to finalize the permanent plan for the child consistent with section 260.012 were made including reasonable efforts: (i) to prevent the child's placement and to reunify the child with the parent or guardian from whom the child was removed at the earliest time consistent with the child's safety. The court's findings must include a brief description of what preventive and reunification efforts were made and why further efforts could not have prevented or eliminated the necessity of removal or that reasonable efforts were not required under section 260.012 or 260C.178, subdivision 1; (ii) to identify and locate any noncustodial or nonresident parent of the child and to assess such parent's ability to provide day-to-day care of the child, and, where appropriate, provide services necessary to enable the noncustodial or nonresident parent to safely provide day-to-day care of the child as required under section 260C.219, unless such services are not required under section 260.012 or 260C.178, subdivision 1. The court's findings must include a description of the agency's efforts to: (A) identify and locate the child's noncustodial or nonresident parent; (B) assess the noncustodial or nonresident parent's ability to provide day-to-day care of the child; and (C) if appropriate, provide services necessary to enable the noncustodial or nonresident parent to safely provide the child's day-to-day care, including efforts to engage the noncustodial or nonresident parent in assuming care and responsibility of the child; (iii) tonew text begin inquire about the child's heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10, andnew text end make the diligent search for relatives and provide the notices required under section 260C.221; a finding made pursuant to a hearing under section 260C.202 that the agency has made diligent efforts to conduct a relative search and has appropriately engaged relatives who responded to the notice under section 260C.221 and other relatives, who came to the attention of the agency after notice under section 260C.221 was sent, in placement and case planning decisions fulfills the requirement of this item; (iv) to identify and make a foster care placement of the child, considering the order in section 260C.212, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), in the home of an unlicensed relative, according to the requirements of section 142B.06, a licensed relative, or other licensed foster care provider, who will commit to being the permanent legal parent or custodian for the child in the event reunification cannot occur, but who will actively support the reunification plan for the child. If the court finds that the agency has not appropriately considered relatives for placement of the child, the court shall order the agency to comply with section 260C.212, subdivision 2, paragraph (a). The court may order the agency to continue considering relatives for placement of the child regardless of the child's current placement setting; and (v) to place siblings together in the same home or to ensure visitation is occurring when siblings are separated in foster care placement and visitation is in the siblings' best interests under section 260C.212, subdivision 2, paragraph (d); and (5) if the child has been adjudicated as a child in need of protection or services because the child is in need of special services or care to treat or ameliorate a mental disability or emotional disturbance as defined in section 245.4871, subdivision 15, the written findings shall also set forth: (i) whether the child has mental health needs that must be addressed by the case plan; (ii) what consideration was given to the diagnostic and functional assessments performed by the child's mental health professional and to health and mental health care professionals' treatment recommendations; (iii) what consideration was given to the requests or preferences of the child's parent or guardian with regard to the child's interventions, services, or treatment; and (iv) what consideration was given to the cultural appropriateness of the child's treatment or services. (b) If the court finds that the social services agency's preventive or reunification efforts have not been reasonable but that further preventive or reunification efforts could not permit the child to safely remain at home, the court may nevertheless authorize or continue the removal of the child. (c) If the child has been identified by the responsible social services agency as the subject of concurrent permanency planning, the court shall review the reasonable efforts of the agency to develop a permanency plan for the child that includes a primary plan that is for reunification with the child's parent or guardian and a secondary plan that is for an alternative, legally permanent home for the child in the event reunification cannot be achieved in a timely manner. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.202, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Court review for a child placed in foster care. (a) If the court orders a child placed in foster care, the court shall review the out-of-home placement plan and the child's placement at least every 90 days as required in juvenile court rules to determine whether continued out-of-home placement is necessary and appropriate or whether the child should be returned home. (b) This review is not required if the court has returned the child home, ordered the child permanently placed away from the parent under sections 260C.503 to 260C.521, or terminated rights under section 260C.301. Court review for a child permanently placed away from a parent, including where the child is under guardianship of the commissioner, is governed by section 260C.607. (c) When a child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program setting as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 26d, the responsible social services agency must submit evidence to the court as specified in section 260C.712. (d) No later than three months after the child's placement in foster care, the court shall review agency efforts to search for and notify relatives pursuant to section 260C.221, and order that the agency's efforts begin immediately, or continue, if the agency has failed to perform, or has not adequately performed, the duties under that section. The court must order the agency to continue to appropriately engage relatives who responded to the notice under section 260C.221 in placement and case planning decisions and to consider relatives for foster care placement consistent with section 260C.221. Notwithstanding a court's finding that the agency has made reasonable efforts to search for and notify relatives under section 260C.221, the court may order the agency to continue making reasonable efforts to search for, notify, engage, and consider relatives who came to the agency's attention after sending the initial notice under section 260C.221. (e) The court shall review the out-of-home placement plan and may modify the plan as provided under section 260C.201, subdivisions 6 and 7. (f) When the court transfers the custody of a child to a responsible social services agency resulting in foster care or protective supervision with a noncustodial parent under subdivision 1, the court shall notify the parents of the provisions of sections 260C.204 and 260C.503 to 260C.521, as required under juvenile court rules. deleted text begin (g) When a child remains in or returns to foster care pursuant to section 260C.451 and the court has jurisdiction pursuant to section 260C.193, subdivision 6, paragraph (c), the court shall at least annually conduct the review required under section 260C.203. deleted text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.202, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Court review prior to the 18th birthday of a child in foster care. new text end new text begin (a) The court must conduct a review during the 90-day period prior to the 18th birthday of a child in foster care. new text end new text begin (b) The responsible social services agency must file a written report with the court containing or attaching the following: new text end new text begin (1) the child's name, date of birth, race, gender, and current address; new text end new text begin (2) whether the child is eligible for extended foster care and if not, the reason or reasons why the child is not eligible; new text end new text begin (3) a written summary describing how the child was involved in creating the child's plan for after their 18th birthday; new text end new text begin (4) the date the required extended foster care eligibility notice in section 260C.451, subdivision 1, was provided and the child's plan after the child's 18th birthday; new text end new text begin (5) the child's most recent independent living plan required under section 260C.212, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (6) if the agency's recommendation is to extend jurisdiction up to age 19 under section 260C.193, why the extended jurisdiction is in the child's best interest; new text end new text begin (7) if the agency's recommendation is to reunify the child with their parent or legal guardian, why reunification is in the child's best interest; new text end new text begin (8) if the agency plans to transition the child into adult services on or after the child's 18th birthday, a summary of the transition plan as required in section 260C.452 and how this plan is in the child's best interest; and new text end new text begin (9) if the child's plan is to leave foster care at age 18 and not continue in extended foster care, a copy of their 180-day transition plan required in section 260C.452 and the reasons the child is not continuing in extended foster care. new text end new text begin (c) The agency must inform the child and parties to the proceeding of the reporting and court review requirements of this subdivision and their right to request a hearing. The child or a party to the proceeding may request a hearing if they believe the agency did not make reasonable efforts under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (d) Upon receiving the report, the court must hold a hearing when a party to the proceeding or the child requests a hearing. In all other circumstances, the court has the discretion to hold a hearing or issue an order without a hearing. new text end new text begin (e) The court must issue an order with findings including but not limited to the following: new text end new text begin (1) whether the responsible social services agency provided the notice to the child about extended foster care as required in section 260C.451; new text end new text begin (2) whether the responsible social services agency engaged with the child and appropriately planned with the child to transition to adulthood; and new text end new text begin (3) if the child has decided to not continue in the extended foster care program at age 18, whether the responsible social services agency informed the child that they can reenter extended foster care up to age 21 or that the child is not eligible to reenter and why. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.202, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Court reviews for a child over age 18 in foster care. new text end new text begin When a child remains in or returns to foster care pursuant to section 260C.451 and the court has jurisdiction pursuant to section 260C.193, subdivision 6, paragraph (c), the court must at least annually conduct the review required under section 260C.203. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.204, is amended to read: 260C.204 PERMANENCY PROGRESS REVIEW FOR CHILDREN IN FOSTER CARE FOR SIX MONTHS. (a) When a child continues in placement out of the home of the parent or guardian from whom the child was removed, no later than six months after the child's placement the court shall conduct a permanency progress hearing to review: (1) the progress of the case, the parent's progress on the case plan or out-of-home placement plan, whichever is applicable; (2) the agency's reasonable, or in the case of an Indian child, active efforts for reunification and its provision of services; (3) the agency's reasonable efforts to finalize the permanent plan for the child under section 260.012, paragraph (e), and to make a placement as required under section 260C.212, subdivision 2, in a home that will commit to being the legally permanent family for the child in the event the child cannot return home according to the timelines in this section; and (4) in the case of an Indian child, active efforts to prevent the breakup of the Indian family and to make a placement according to the placement preferences under United States Code, title 25, chapter 21, section 1915. (b) When a child is placed in a qualified residential treatment program setting as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 26d, the responsible social services agency must submit evidence to the court as specified in section 260C.712. (c) The court shall ensure that notice of the hearing is sent to any relative who: (1) responded to the agency's notice provided under section 260C.221, indicating an interest in participating in planning for the child or being a permanency resource for the child and who has kept the court apprised of the relative's address; or (2) asked to be notified of court proceedings regarding the child as is permitted in section 260C.152, subdivision 5. (d)(1) If the parent or guardian has maintained contact with the child and is complying with the court-ordered out-of-home placement plan, and if the child would benefit from reunification with the parent, the court may either: (i) return the child home, if the conditions that led to the out-of-home placement have been sufficiently mitigated that it is safe and in the child's best interests to return home; or (ii) continue the matter up to a total of six additional months. If the child has not returned home by the end of the additional six months, the court must conduct a hearing according to sections 260C.503 to 260C.521. (2) If the court determines that the parent or guardian is not complying, is not making progress with or engaging with services in the out-of-home placement plan, or is not maintaining regular contact with the child as outlined in the visitation plan required as part of the out-of-home placement plan under section 260C.212, the court may order the responsible social services agency: (i) to develop a plan for legally permanent placement of the child away from the parent; (ii) to consider, identify, recruit, and support one or more permanency resources from the child's relatives and foster parent, consistent with new text begin clause (3) and new text end section 260C.212, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), to be the legally permanent home in the event the child cannot be returned to the parent. Any relative or the child's foster parent may ask the court to order the agency to consider them for permanent placement of the child in the event the child cannot be returned to the parent. A relative or foster parent who wants to be considered under this item shall cooperate with the background study required under section 245C.08, if the individual has not already done so, and with the home study process required under chapter 142B for providing child foster care and for adoption under section 259.41. The home study referred to in this item shall be a single-home study in the form required by the commissioner of children, youth, and families or similar study required by the individual's state of residence when the subject of the study is not a resident of Minnesota. The court may order the responsible social services agency to make a referral under the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children when necessary to obtain a home study for an individual who wants to be considered for transfer of permanent legal and physical custody or adoption of the child; and (iii) to file a petition to support an order for the legally permanent placement plan. new text begin (3) Consistent with section 260C.223, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), the responsible social services agency must not define a foster family as the permanent home for a child until: new text end new text begin (i) inquiry and Tribal notice requirements under section 260.761, subdivisions 1 and 2, are satisfied; new text end new text begin (ii) inquiry about the child's heritage, including their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10, has been completed; and new text end new text begin (iii) the court has determined that reasonable or active efforts toward completing the relative search requirements in section 260C.221 have been made. new text end (e) Following the review under this section: (1) if the court has either returned the child home or continued the matter up to a total of six additional months, the agency shall continue to provide services to support the child's return home or to make reasonable efforts to achieve reunification of the child and the parent as ordered by the court under an approved case plan; (2) if the court orders the agency to develop a plan for the transfer of permanent legal and physical custody of the child to a relative, a petition supporting the plan shall be filed in juvenile court within 30 days of the hearing required under this section and a trial on the petition held within 60 days of the filing of the pleadings; or (3) if the court orders the agency to file a termination of parental rights, unless the county attorney can show cause why a termination of parental rights petition should not be filed, a petition for termination of parental rights shall be filed in juvenile court within 30 days of the hearing required under this section and a trial on the petition held within 60 days of the filing of the petition. Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.212, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Out-of-home placement; plan. deleted text begin (a) An out-of-home placement plan shall be prepared within 30 days after any child is placed in foster care by court order or a deleted text end deleted text begin voluntary placement agreement between the responsible social services agency and the child's parent pursuant to section 260C.227 or chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 260D deleted text end deleted text begin . deleted text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (a)new text end An out-of-home placement plan means a written document individualized to the needs of the child and the child's parents or guardians that is prepared by the responsible social services agencynew text begin using a form developed by the commissioner. The plan must be completednew text end jointly with the child's parents or guardians and in consultation with the child's guardian ad litem; the child's tribe, if the child is an Indian child; the child's foster parent or representative of the foster care facility; and, when appropriate, the child. When a child is age 14 or older, the child may include two other individuals on the team preparing the child's out-of-home placement plan. The child may select one member of the case planning team to be designated as the child's advisor and to advocate with respect to the application of the reasonable and prudent parenting standards. The responsible social services agency may reject an individual selected by the child if the agency has good cause to believe that the individual would not act in the best interest of the child. For a child in voluntary foster care for treatment under chapter 260D, preparation of the out-of-home placement plan shall additionally include the child's mental health treatment provider. For a child 18 years of age or older, the responsible social services agency shall involve the child and the child's parents as appropriate. As appropriate, the plan shall be: (1) submitted to the court for approval under section 260C.178, subdivision 7; (2) ordered by the court, either as presented or modified after hearing, under section 260C.178, subdivision 7, or 260C.201, subdivision 6; and (3) signed by the parent or parents or guardian of the child, the child's guardian ad litem, a representative of the child's tribe, the responsible social services agency, and, if possible, the child. new text begin (b) Before an out-of-home placement plan is signed by the parent or parents or guardian of the child, the responsible social services agency must provide the parent or parents or guardian with a one- to two-page summary of the plan using a form developed by the commissioner. The out-of-home placement plan summary must clearly summarize the plan's contents under paragraph (d) and list the requirements and responsibilities for the parent or parents or guardian using plain language. The summary must be updated and provided to the parent or parents or guardian when the out-of-home placement plan is updated under subdivision 1a. new text end new text begin (c) An out-of-home placement plan summary shall be prepared within 30 days after any child is placed in foster care by court order or voluntary placement agreement between the responsible social services agency and the child's parent pursuant to section 260C.227 or chapter 260D. An out-of-home placement plan shall be prepared within 60 days after any child is placed in foster care by court order or a voluntary placement agreement between the responsible social services agency and the child's parent pursuant to section 260C.227 or chapter 260D. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The out-of-home placement plan shall be explained by the responsible social services agency to all persons involved in the plan's implementation, including the child who has signed the plan, and shall set forth: (1) a description of the foster care home or facility selected, including how the out-of-home placement plan is designed to achieve a safe placement for the child in the least restrictive, most family-like setting available that is in close proximity to the home of the child's parents or guardians when the case plan goal is reunification; and how the placement is consistent with the best interests and special needs of the child according to the factors under subdivision 2, paragraph (b); new text begin (2) a description of the services offered and provided to prevent removal of the child from the home; new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end the specific reasons for the placement of the child in foster care, and when reunification is the plan, a description of the problems or conditions in the home of the parent or parents that necessitated removal of the child from home and new text begin the services offered and provided to support new text end the changes the parent or parents must make for the child to safely return homedeleted text begin ;deleted text end deleted text begin (3) a description of the services offered and provided to prevent removal of the child from the homedeleted text end and to reunify the family including: (i) the specific actions to be taken by the parent or parents of the child to eliminate or correct the problems or conditions identified in clause (2), and the time period during which the actions are to be taken; and (ii) the reasonable efforts, or in the case of an Indian child, active efforts to be made to achieve a safe and stable home for the child including social and other supportive services to be provided or offered to the parent or parents or guardian of the child, the child, and the residential facility during the period the child is in the residential facility; (4) a description of any services or resources that were requested by the child or the child's parent, guardian, foster parent, or custodian since the date of the child's placement in the residential facility, and whether those services or resources were provided and if not, the basis for the denial of the services or resources; (5) the visitation plan for the parent or parents or guardian, other relatives as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 26b or 27, and siblings of the child if the siblings are not placed together in foster care, and whether visitation is consistent with the best interest of the child, during the period the child is in foster care; (6) when a child cannot return to or be in the care of either parent, documentation of steps to finalize new text begin permanency through either:new text end new text begin (i) new text end adoption as the permanency plan for the child through reasonable efforts to place the child for adoption pursuant to section 260C.605. At a minimum, the documentation must include consideration of whether adoption is in the best interests of the child and child-specific recruitment efforts such as a relative search, consideration of relatives for adoptive placement, and the use of state, regional, and national adoption exchanges to facilitate orderly and timely placements in and outside of the state. A copy of this documentation shall be provided to the court in the review required under section 260C.317, subdivision 3, paragraph (b);new text begin ornew text end deleted text begin (7) when a child cannot return to or be in the care of either parent, documentation of steps to finalizedeleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end the transfer of permanent legal and physical custody to a relative as the permanency plan for the child. This documentation must support the requirements of the kinship placement agreement under section 142A.605 and must include the reasonable efforts used to determine that it is not appropriate for the child to return home or be adopted, and reasons why permanent placement with a relative through a Northstar kinship assistance arrangement is in the child's best interest; how the child meets the eligibility requirements for Northstar kinship assistance payments; agency efforts to discuss adoption with the child's relative foster parent and reasons why the relative foster parent chose not to pursue adoption, if applicable; and agency efforts to discuss with the child's parent or parents the permanent transfer of permanent legal and physical custody or the reasons why these efforts were not made; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end efforts to ensure the child's educational stability while in foster care for a child who attained the minimum age for compulsory school attendance under state law and is enrolled full time in elementary or secondary school, or instructed in elementary or secondary education at home, or instructed in an independent study elementary or secondary program, or incapable of attending school on a full-time basis due to a medical condition that is documented and supported by regularly updated information in the child's case plan. Educational stability efforts include: (i) efforts to ensure that the child remains in the same school in which the child was enrolled prior to placement or upon the child's move from one placement to another, including efforts to work with the local education authorities to ensure the child's educational stability and attendance; or (ii) if it is not in the child's best interest to remain in the same school that the child was enrolled in prior to placement or move from one placement to another, efforts to ensure immediate and appropriate enrollment for the child in a new school; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end the educational records of the child including the most recent information available regarding: (i) the names and addresses of the child's educational providers; (ii) the child's grade level performance; (iii) the child's school record; (iv) a statement about how the child's placement in foster care takes into account proximity to the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement; and (v) any other relevant educational information; deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end the efforts by the responsible social services agency to deleted text begin ensuredeleted text end new text begin support the child's well-being by ensuringnew text end the oversight and continuity of health care services for the foster childnew text begin and documenting their health recordnew text end , including: (i) the plan to schedule the child's initial health screens; (ii) how the child's known medical problems and identified needs from the screens, including any known communicable diseases, as defined in section 144.4172, subdivision 2, shall be monitored and treated while the child is in foster care; (iii) how the child's medical information shall be updated and shared, including the child's immunizations; (iv) who is responsible to coordinate and respond to the child's health care needs, including the role of the parent, the agency, and the foster parent; (v) who is responsible for oversight of the child's prescription medications; (vi) how physicians or other appropriate medical and nonmedical professionals shall be consulted and involved in assessing the health and well-being of the child and determine the appropriate medical treatment for the child; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (vii) the responsibility to ensure that the child has access to medical care through either medical insurance or medical assistance;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (11) the health records of the child includingdeleted text end new text begin (viii)new text end information available regarding: deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (A)new text end the names and addresses of the child's health care and dental care providers; deleted text begin (ii)deleted text end new text begin (B)new text end a record of the child's immunizations; deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (C)new text end the child's known medical problems, including any known communicable diseases as defined in section 144.4172, subdivision 2; deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (D)new text end the child's medications; and deleted text begin (v)deleted text end new text begin (E)new text end any other relevant health care information such as the child's eligibility for medical insurance or medical assistance; deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end an independent living plan for a child 14 years of age or older, developed in consultation with the child. The child may select one member of the case planning team to be designated as the child's advisor and to advocate with respect to the application of the reasonable and prudent parenting standards in subdivision 14. The plan should include, but not be limited to, the following objectives: (i) educational, vocational, or employment planning; (ii) health care planning and medical coverage; (iii) transportation including, where appropriate, assisting the child in obtaining a driver's license; (iv) money management, including the responsibility of the responsible social services agency to ensure that the child annually receives, at no cost to the child, a consumer report as defined under section 13C.001 and assistance in interpreting and resolving any inaccuracies in the report; (v) planning for housing; (vi) social and recreational skills; (vii) establishing and maintaining connections with the child's family and community; and (viii) regular opportunities to engage in age-appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities typical for the child's age group, taking into consideration the capacities of the individual child; deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end for a child in voluntary foster care for treatment under chapter 260D, diagnostic and assessment information, specific services relating to meeting the mental health care needs of the child, and treatment outcomes; deleted text begin (14)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end for a child 14 years of age or older, a signed acknowledgment that describes the child's rights regarding education, health care, visitation, safety and protection from exploitation, and court participation; receipt of the documents identified in section 260C.452; and receipt of an annual credit report. The acknowledgment shall state that the rights were explained in an age-appropriate manner to the child; and deleted text begin (15)deleted text end new text begin (13)new text end for a child placed in a qualified residential treatment program, the plan must include the requirements in section 260C.708. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The parent or parents or guardian and the child each shall have the right to legal counsel in the preparation of the case plan and shall be informed of the right at the time of placement of the child. The child shall also have the right to a guardian ad litem. If unable to employ counsel from their own resources, the court shall appoint counsel upon the request of the parent or parents or the child or the child's legal guardian. The parent or parents may also receive assistance from any person or social services agency in preparation of the case plan. deleted text begin (e) Before an out-of-home placement plan is signed by the parent or parents or guardian of the child, the responsible social services agency must provide the parent or parents or guardian with a one- to two-page summary of the plan using a form developed by the commissioner. The out-of-home placement plan summary must clearly summarize the plan's contents under paragraph (c) and list the requirements and responsibilities for the parent or deleted text end deleted text begin parents or guardian using plain language. The summary must be updated and provided to the parent or parents or guardian when the out-of-home placement plan is updated under subdivision 1a. deleted text end (f) After the plan has been agreed upon by the parties involved or approved or ordered by the court, the foster parents shall be fully informed of the provisions of the case plan and shall be provided a copy of the plan. (g) Upon the child's discharge from foster care, the responsible social services agency must provide the child's parent, adoptive parent, or permanent legal and physical custodian, and the child, if the child is 14 years of age or older, with a current copy of the child's health and education record. If a child meets the conditions in subdivision 15, paragraph (b), the agency must also provide the child with the child's social and medical history. The responsible social services agency may give a copy of the child's health and education record and social and medical history to a child who is younger than 14 years of age, if it is appropriate and if subdivision 15, paragraph (b), applies. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.212, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Out-of-home placement plan update. (a) Within 30 days of placing the child in foster care, the agency mustnew text begin complete the child's out-of-home placement plan summary and file it with the court. Within 60 days of placing the child in foster care, the agency mustnew text end file the child's initial out-of-home placement plan with the court. After filing the child's deleted text begin initialdeleted text end out-of-home placement plan, the agency shall update and file the child's out-of-home placement plan with the court as follows: (1) when the agency moves a child to a different foster care setting, the agency shall inform the court within 30 days of the child's placement change or court-ordered trial home visit. The agency must file the child's updatednew text begin out-of-home placement plan summary andnew text end out-of-home placement plan with the court at the next required review hearing; (2) when the agency places a child in a qualified residential treatment program as defined in section 260C.007, subdivision 26d, or moves a child from one qualified residential treatment program to a different qualified residential treatment program, the agency must update the child's out-of-home placement plan within 60 days. To meet the requirements of section 260C.708, the agency must file the child's out-of-home placement plan along with the agency's report seeking the court's approval of the child's placement at a qualified residential treatment program under section 260C.71. After the court issues an order, the agency must update the child's out-of-home placement plan to document the court's approval or disapproval of the child's placement in a qualified residential treatment program; (3) when the agency places a child with the child's parent in a licensed residential family-based substance use disorder treatment program under section 260C.190, the agency must identify the treatment program where the child will be placed in the child's out-of-home placement plan prior to the child's placement. The agency must file the child'snew text begin out-of-home placement plan summary andnew text end out-of-home placement plan with the court at the next required review hearing; and (4) under sections 260C.227 and 260C.521, the agency must update the child'snew text begin out-of-home placement plan summary andnew text end out-of-home placement plan and file the child's out-of-home placement plan with the court. (b) When none of the items in paragraph (a) apply, the agency must update the child'snew text begin out-of-home placement plan summary andnew text end out-of-home placement plan no later than 180 days after the child's initial placement and every six months thereafter, consistent with section 260C.203, paragraph (a). Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.223, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Program; goals. (a) The commissioner of children, youth, and families shall establish a program for concurrent permanency planning for child protection services. (b) Concurrent permanency planning involves a planning process for children who are placed out of the home of their parents pursuant to a court order, or who have been voluntarily placed out of the home by the parents for 60 days or more and who are not developmentally disabled or emotionally disabled under section 260C.212, subdivision 9. The responsible social services agency shall develop an alternative permanency plan while making reasonable efforts for reunification of the child with the family, if required by section 260.012. The goals of concurrent permanency planning are to: (1) achieve early permanency for children; (2) decrease children's length of stay in foster care and reduce the number of moves children experience in foster care; and (3) deleted text begin develop a group of familiesdeleted text end new text begin establish a foster parent for a childnew text end who will work towards reunification and also serve as new text begin a new text end permanent deleted text begin familiesdeleted text end new text begin familynew text end for children. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.223, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Development of guidelines and protocols. new text begin (a) new text end The commissioner shall establish guidelines and protocols for social services agencies involved in concurrent permanency planning, including criteria for conducting concurrent permanency planning based on relevant factors such as: (1) age of the child and duration of out-of-home placement; (2) prognosis for successful reunification with parents; (3) availability of relatives and other concerned individuals to provide support or a permanent placement for the child; and (4) special needs of the child and other factors affecting the child's best interests. new text begin (b) new text end In developing the guidelines and protocols, the commissioner shall consult with interest groups within the child protection system, including child protection workers, child protection advocates, county attorneys, law enforcement, community service organizations, the councils of color, and the ombudsperson for families. new text begin (c) The responsible social services agency must not make a foster family the permanent home for a child until: new text end new text begin (1) inquiry and Tribal notice requirements under section 260.761, subdivisions 1 and 2, are satisfied; new text end new text begin (2) inquiry about the child's heritage, including their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10, has been completed; and new text end new text begin (3) the court has determined that reasonable or active efforts toward completing the relative search requirements in section 260C.221 have been made. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.329, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Petition. new text begin (a) new text end The new text begin following individuals may file a petition for the reestablishment of the legal parent and child relationship:new text end new text begin (1) new text end county attorneydeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2)new text end a parent whose parental rights were terminated under a previous order of the courtdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (3) a parent whose voluntary consent to adoption was accepted by the court and: new text end new text begin (i) the identified prospective adoptive parent did not finalize the adoption; or new text end new text begin (ii) the adoption finalized but subsequently dissolved and the child returned to foster care and guardianship of the commissioner; new text end new text begin (4) new text end a child who is ten years of age or olderdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (5)new text end the responsible social services agencydeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or new text begin (6)new text end a guardian ad litem deleted text begin may file a petition for the reestablishment of the legal parent and child relationshipdeleted text end . new text begin (b)new text end A parent filing a petition under this section shall pay a filing fee in the amount required under section 357.021, subdivision 2, clause (1). The filing fee may be waived pursuant to chapter 563. A petition for the reestablishment of the legal parent and child relationship may be filed when: (1) the parent has corrected the conditions that led to an order terminating parental rights; (2) the parent is willing and has the capability to provide day-to-day care and maintain the health, safety, and welfare of the child; (3) the child has been in foster care for at least 24 months after the court issued the order terminating parental rights; (4) the child deleted text begin hasdeleted text end new text begin isnew text end not deleted text begin beendeleted text end new text begin currentlynew text end adopted; and (5) the child is not the subject of a written adoption placement agreement between the responsible social services agency and the prospective adoptive parent, as required under Minnesota Rules, part 9560.0060, subpart 2. Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.329, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Hearing. The court may grant the petition ordering the reestablishment of the legal parent and child relationship only if it finds by clear and convincing evidence that: (1) reestablishment of the legal parent and child relationship is in the child's best interests; (2) the child deleted text begin hasdeleted text end new text begin isnew text end not deleted text begin beendeleted text end new text begin currentlynew text end adopted; (3) the child is not the subject of a written adoption placement agreement between the responsible social services agency and the prospective adoptive parent, as required under Minnesota Rules, part 9560.0060, subpart 2; (4) at least 24 months have elapsed following a final order terminating parental rights and the child remains in foster care; (5) the child desires to reside with the parent; (6) the parent has corrected the conditions that led to an order terminating parental rights; and (7) the parent is willing and has the capability to provide day-to-day care and maintain the health, safety, and welfare of the child. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.451, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Administrative or court review of placements. (a) The court deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end conduct reviews at least annually to ensure the responsible social services agency is making reasonable efforts to finalize the permanency plan for the child. new text begin (b) The responsible social services agency must file a written report with the court containing or attaching the following: new text end new text begin (1) the child's name, date of birth, race, gender, and current address; new text end new text begin (2) a written summary describing planning with the child, including supports and services to ensure the child's safety, housing stability, well-being needs, and independent living skills; new text end new text begin (3) the child's most recent out-of-home placement plan and independent living plan required under section 260C.212, subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (4) if the child's plan is to not continue in extended foster care or if the child will reach age 21 before the next review, a copy of their 180-day transition plan as required in section 260C.452, subdivision 4; and new text end new text begin (5) if the agency plans to transition the child into adult services, a summary of the transition plan as required in section 260C.452, subdivision 4, and how this plan is in the child's best interest. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The court deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end find that the responsible social services agency is making reasonable efforts to finalize the permanency plan for the child when the responsible social services agency: (1) provides appropriate support to the child and new text begin caregiver or new text end foster deleted text begin care providerdeleted text end new text begin parentnew text end to ensure continuing stability and success in placement; (2) works with the child to plan for transition to adulthood and assists the child in demonstrating progress in achieving related goals; (3) works with the child to plan for independent living skills and assists the child in demonstrating progress in achieving independent living goals; and (4) prepares the child for independence according to sections 260C.203, paragraph (d), and 260C.452, subdivision 4. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The responsible social services agency must ensure that an administrative review that meets the requirements of this section and section 260C.203 is completed at least six months after each of the court's annual reviews. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260C.452, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Administrative or court review of placements. (a) When the youth is 14 years of age or older, the court, in consultation with the youth, shall review the youth's independent living plan according to section 260C.203, paragraph (d). (b) The responsible social services agency shall file a copy of the notification of foster care benefits for a youth who is 18 years of age or older according to section 260C.451, subdivision 1, with the court. If the responsible social services agency does not file the notice by the time the youth is 17-1/2 years of age, the court shall require the responsible social services agency to file the notice. (c) When a youth is 18 years of age or older, the court shall ensure that the responsible social services agency assists the youth in obtaining the following documents before the youth leaves foster care: a Social Security card; an official or certified copy of the youth's birth certificate; a state identification card or driver's license, Tribal enrollment identification card, deleted text begin greendeleted text end new text begin permanent residentnew text end card, or school visa; health insurance information; the youth's school, medical, and dental records; a contact list of the youth's medical, dental, and mental health providers; and contact information for the youth's siblings, if the siblings are in foster care. (d) For a youth who will be discharged from foster care at 18 years of age or older because the youth is not eligible for extended foster care benefits or chooses to leave foster care, the responsible social services agency must develop a personalized transition plan as directed by the youth during the 180-day period immediately prior to the expected date of discharge. The transition plan must be as detailed as the youth elects and include specific options, including but not limited to: (1) affordable housing with necessary supports that does not include a homeless shelter; (2) health insurance, including eligibility for medical assistance as defined in section 256B.055, subdivision 17; (3) education, including application to the Education and Training Voucher Program; (4) local opportunities for mentors and continuing support services; (5) workforce supports and employment services; (6) a copy of the youth's consumer credit report as defined in section 13C.001 and assistance in interpreting and resolving any inaccuracies in the report, at no cost to the youth; (7) information on executing a health care directive under chapter 145C and on the importance of designating another individual to make health care decisions on behalf of the youth if the youth becomes unable to participate in decisions; (8) appropriate contact information through 21 years of age if the youth needs information or help dealing with a crisis situation; and (9) official documentation that the youth was previously in foster care. Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.09, is amended to read: 260E.09 REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (a) An oral report shall be made immediately by telephone or otherwise. An oral report made by a person required under section 260E.06, subdivision 1, to report shall be followed within 72 hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, by a report in writing to the appropriate police department, the county sheriff, the agency responsible for assessing or investigating the report, or the local welfare agency. (b) Any report shall be of sufficient content to identify the child, any person believed to be responsible for the maltreatment of the child if the person is known, the nature and extent of the maltreatment, and the name and address of the reporter. The local welfare agency or agency responsible for assessing or investigating the report shall accept a report made under section 260E.06 notwithstanding refusal by a reporter to provide the reporter's name or address as long as the report is otherwise sufficient under this paragraph.new text begin The local welfare agency or agency responsible for assessing or investigating the report shall ask the reporter if the reporter is aware of the child or family heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and their race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10.new text end (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), upon implementation of the provider licensing and reporting hub, an individual who has an account with the provider licensing and reporting hub and is required to report suspected maltreatment at a licensed program under section 260E.06, subdivision 1, may submit a written report in the hub in a manner prescribed by the commissioner and is not required to make an oral report. A report submitted through the provider licensing and reporting hub must be made immediately. Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.20, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. General duties. (a) The local welfare agency shall offer services to prevent future maltreatment, safeguarding and enhancing the welfare of the maltreated child, and supporting and preserving family life whenever possible. (b) If the report alleges a violation of a criminal statute involving maltreatment or child endangerment under section 609.378, the local law enforcement agency and local welfare agency shall coordinate the planning and execution of their respective investigation and assessment efforts to avoid a duplication of fact-finding efforts and multiple interviews. Each agency shall prepare a separate report of the results of the agency's investigation or assessment. (c) In cases of alleged child maltreatment resulting in death, the local agency may rely on the fact-finding efforts of a law enforcement investigation to make a determination of whether or not maltreatment occurred. (d) When necessary, the local welfare agency shall seek authority to remove the child from the custody of a parent, guardian, or adult with whom the child is living. (e) In performing any of these duties, the local welfare agency shall maintain an appropriate record. (f) In conducting a family assessmentnew text begin , noncaregiver human trafficking assessment,new text end or investigation, the local welfare agency shall gather information on the existence of substance abuse and domestic violence. (g) If the family assessmentnew text begin , noncaregiver human trafficking assessment,new text end or investigation indicates there is a potential for abuse of alcohol or other drugs by the parent, guardian, or person responsible for the child's care, the local welfare agency must coordinate a comprehensive assessment pursuant to section 245G.05. (h) The agency may use either a family assessment or investigation to determine whether the child is safe when responding to a report resulting from birth match data under section 260E.03, subdivision 23, paragraph (c). If the child subject of birth match data is determined to be safe, the agency shall consult with the county attorney to determine the appropriateness of filing a petition alleging the child is in need of protection or services under section 260C.007, subdivision 6, clause (16), in order to deliver needed services. If the child is determined not to be safe, the agency and the county attorney shall take appropriate action as required under section 260C.503, subdivision 2. new text begin (i) When conducting any assessment or investigation, the agency shall ask the child, if age appropriate; parents; extended family; and reporter about the child's family heritage, including the child's Tribal lineage pursuant to section 260.761 and the child's race, culture, and ethnicity pursuant to section 260.63, subdivision 10. new text end Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.20, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Collection of information. (a) The local welfare agency responsible for conducting a family assessmentnew text begin , noncaregiver human trafficking assessment,new text end or investigation shall collect available and relevant information to determine child safety, risk of subsequent maltreatment, and family strengths and needs and share not public information with an Indian's Tribal social services agency without violating any law of the state that may otherwise impose a duty of confidentiality on the local welfare agency in order to implement the Tribal state agreement. (b) The local welfare agency or the agency responsible for investigating the report shall collect available and relevant information to ascertain whether maltreatment occurred and whether protective services are needed. (c) Information collected includes, when relevant, information regarding the person reporting the alleged maltreatment, including the nature of the reporter's relationship to the child and to the alleged offender, and the basis of the reporter's knowledge for the report; the child allegedly being maltreated; the alleged offender; the child's caretaker; and other collateral sources having relevant information related to the alleged maltreatment. (d) Information relevant to the assessment or investigation must be requested, and may include: (1) the child's sex and age; prior reports of maltreatment, including any maltreatment reports that were screened out and not accepted for assessment or investigation; information relating to developmental functioning; credibility of the child's statement; and whether the information provided under this clause is consistent with other information collected during the course of the assessment or investigation; (2) new text begin except in a noncaregiver human trafficking assessment, new text end the alleged offender's age, a record check for prior reports of maltreatment, and criminal charges and convictions; (3) collateral source information regarding the alleged maltreatment and care of the child. Collateral information includes, when relevant: (i) a medical examination of the child; (ii) prior medical records relating to the alleged maltreatment or the care of the child maintained by any facility, clinic, or health care professional and an interview with the treating professionals; and (iii) interviews with the child's caretakers, including the child's parent, guardian, foster parent, child care provider, teachers, counselors, family members, relatives, and other persons who may have knowledge regarding the alleged maltreatment and the care of the child; and (4) information on the existence of domestic abuse and violence in the home of the child, and substance abuse. (e) Nothing in this subdivision precludes the local welfare agency, the local law enforcement agency, or the agency responsible for assessing or investigating the report from collecting other relevant information necessary to conduct the assessment or investigation. (f) Notwithstanding section 13.384 or 144.291 to 144.298, the local welfare agency has access to medical data and records for purposes of paragraph (d), clause (3). Sec. 28. new text begin [260E.215] REPORTING OF SCHOOL ATTENDANCE CONCERNS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Reports required. new text end new text begin (a) A person mandated to report under this chapter must immediately report to the local welfare agency or designated partner if the person knows or has reason to believe that a child required to be enrolled in school under section 120A.22 has at least seven unexcused absences in the current school year and is at risk of educational neglect or truancy under section 260C.163, subdivision 11. new text end new text begin (b) Any person may make a voluntary report if the person knows or has reason to believe that a child required to be enrolled in school under section 120A.22 has at least seven unexcused absences in the current school year and is at risk of educational neglect or truancy under section 260C.163, subdivision 11. new text end new text begin (c) An oral report must be made immediately. An oral report made by a person required to report under paragraph (a) must be followed within 72 hours, exclusive of weekends and holidays, by a report in writing to the local welfare agency. A report must sufficiently identify the child and the child's parent or guardian, the actual or estimated number of the child's unexcused absences in the current school year, the efforts made by school officials to resolve attendance concerns with the family, and the name and address of the reporter. A voluntary reporter under paragraph (b) may refuse to provide their name or address if the report is otherwise sufficient, and the local welfare agency must accept such a report. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Local welfare agency. new text end new text begin (a) The local welfare agency or partner designated to provide child welfare services must provide a child welfare response for a report that alleges a child enrolled in school has seven or more unexcused absences. When providing a child welfare response under this paragraph, the local welfare agency or designated partner must offer services to the child and the child's family to address school attendance concerns or may partner with a county attorney's office, a community-based organization, or other community partner to provide the services. The services must be culturally and linguistically appropriate and tailored to the needs of the child and the child's family. This section is subject to the requirements of the Minnesota Indian Family Preservation Act under sections 260.751 to 260.835 and the Minnesota African American Family Preservation and Child Welfare Disproportionality Act under sections 260.61 to 260.693. new text end new text begin (b) If the unexcused absences continue and the family has not engaged with services under paragraph (a) after the local welfare agency or partner designated to provide child welfare services has made multiple varied attempts to engage the child's family, a report of educational neglect must be made regardless of the number of unexcused absences the child has accrued. The local welfare agency must determine the response path assignment pursuant to section 260E.17 and may proceed with the process outlined in section 260C.141. new text end Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.24, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Timing. The local welfare agency shall conclude the family assessmentnew text begin , the noncaregiver human trafficking assessment,new text end or the investigation within 45 days of the receipt of a report. The conclusion of the assessment or investigation may be extended to permit the completion of a criminal investigation or the receipt of expert information requested within 45 days of the receipt of the report. Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260E.24, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Determination after family assessment or a noncaregiver human trafficking assessment. After conducting a family assessment or a noncaregiver human trafficking assessment, the local welfare agency shall determine whether child protective services are needed to address the safety of the child and other family members and the risk of subsequent maltreatment. The local welfare agency must document the information collected under section 260E.20, subdivision 3, related to the completed family assessmentnew text begin or noncaregiver human trafficking assessmentnew text end in the child's or family's case notes. Sec. 31. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall change paragraphs to subdivisions, clauses to paragraphs, and items to clauses in Minnesota Statutes, sections 260C.203 and 260C.204. The revisor shall make any necessary grammatical changes or changes to sentence structure necessary to preserve the meaning of the text as a result of the changes. The revisor of statutes must correct any statutory cross-references consistent with the changes in this section. new text end ARTICLE 4 TRANSFERS TO DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES Section 1. new text begin TRANSFERS TO THE DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES IN UNCODIFIED LAW.new text end new text begin Any power, duty, or responsibility given to the commissioner of human services or the Department of Human Services in an uncodified section of Laws of Minnesota that is a part of, necessary for, or in service of a power, duty, or responsibility transferred in Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 12, section 30, or Laws 2024, chapter 80, transfers to the commissioner of children, youth, and families or the Department of Children, Youth, and Families upon the notice of transfer of the underlying power, duty, or responsibility required in Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 12, section 30, subdivision 1. This section applies to uncodified sections of Laws of Minnesota enacted before and after Laws 2023, chapter 70, including but not limited to Laws 2024, chapter 117, sections 16 to 22. new text end